Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-264
Towns; judgments against; payment.

All judgments recovered against a town or against town officers, in actions prosecuted by or against them in their names of office, shall not be collected by execution, but shall be a town charge and when levied and collected shall be paid to the person or persons to whom the same shall have been adjudged.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 64, p. 149;

R.S.1913, § 1048;

C.S.1922, § 950;

C.S.1929, § 26-264;

R.S.1943, § 23-264.